Hawaii statutes.
§163D-15.6 Commitment and preservation of
agricultural leases. (a) The agribusiness development corporation shall
work toward obtaining commitments from landowners in the leeward and central
districts of Oahu that their agricultural leases shall be for a duration of
twenty or more years and shall not be amended or revoked to allow for a
nonagricultural use of the land; provided that for lands in central Oahu
acquired under Act 234, Session Laws of Hawaii 2008, the agricultural leases
shall be for no more than fifty-five years.

(b) To further ensure the preservation of
agriculture in the leeward and central districts of Oahu, the agribusiness
development corporation shall monitor the agricultural leases of lands using
the water from the Waiahole water system. In the event of any proposed
amendment or revocation of any lease, the corporation shall do all things
within its powers under this chapter to protect and defend the interests of the
agricultural leaseholders to ensure the continuation of agricultural use for
those lands. [L 1998, c 111, §16; am L 2008, c 234, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next